Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5541.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 371. (1) The An injured employee's weekly loss in wages referred to in under this act shall consist consists of the percentage of the injured employee's average weekly earnings of the injured employee computed according to calculated under this section as fairly represents the proportionate extent of the impairment of the employee's earning capacity in the employments covered by under this act in which the employee was working at the time of the personal injury. The weekly loss in wages shall be is fixed as of the time of the personal injury occurs, and determined considering the nature and extent of the personal injury. The compensation payable, when added to the employee's wage earning capacity after the personal injury in the same or other employments, shall must not exceed the employee's average weekly earnings at the time of the injury. (2) As used in this act, "average weekly wage" means the weekly wage earned by the an employee at the time of the employee's injury in all employment, inclusive of including, subject to subsection (8), overtime, premium pay, and cost of living adjustment. , and exclusive of Average weekly wage does not include any fringe benefit or other benefits which continue benefit that continues during the disability or any discretionary bonus. Any fringe or other benefit which that does not continue during the disability shall must be included for purposes of determining an employee's average weekly wage to the extent that the inclusion of the fringe or other benefit will not result in a weekly benefit amount which is greater than 2/3 of the state average weekly wage at the time of injury. The average weekly wage shall be is determined by computing calculating the total wages paid in the highest paid 39 weeks of the 52 weeks immediately preceding the date of injury, and dividing by 39. (3) If the an employee worked less than 39 weeks in the employment in which the employee was injured, the average weekly wage shall be is based upon on the total wages earned by the employee divided by the total number of weeks actually worked. For purposes of this subsection, only those weeks in which work is performed shall be are considered in computing calculating the total wages earned and the number of weeks actually worked. (4) If an employee sustains a compensable injury before completing his or her the employee's first work week, the average weekly wage shall be is calculated by determining the number of hours of work per week contracted for by that employee multiplied by the employee's hourly rate, or the weekly salary contracted for by the employee. (5) If the hourly earning wage of the employee cannot be ascertained, or if the pay has not been designated for the work required, the wage, for the purpose of calculating compensation, shall be taken is considered to be the usual wage for similar services if the services are rendered by paid employees. (6) If there are special circumstances under which the average weekly wage cannot justly be determined by applying subsections (2) to (5), an average weekly wage may be computed calculated by dividing the aggregate earnings during the year before the injury occurred by the number of days when work was performed and multiplying that daily wage by the number of working days customary in the employment, but not less than 5. (7) The average weekly wage as determined under this section shall must be rounded to the nearest dollar. (8) If an injured employee works for an employer that employs not more than 50 employees and the employee earns overtime compensation from that employer, the calculation of the employee's average weekly wage under this section must use the employee's regular rate of pay for the number of overtime hours the employee worked and not 1-1/2 times the employee's regular rate of pay. This subsection does not apply after December 31, 2028. (9) As used in this section, "discretionary bonus" means money the employee's employer pays to an employee that is not a fundamental aspect of the basic wages the employer pays to the employee. Sec. 612. (1) An insurer that provides worker's compensation insurance to an employer described under section 371(8) shall calculate the employer's premium rate to account for the calculation described in section 371(8). If the calculation results in a lower premium rate, the insurer must apply the lower premium rate. This section applies to a worker's compensation insurance contract that is entered into or renewed on or after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. (2) This section does not apply after December 31, 2028.